tr: Ateş yakma aracı türü: Kömür bezi; Pamuklu tutuşturucu; Elektrik arkı; Yağlı odun; Ferroseryum çubuk; Ateş başlatma küpü; Ateş başlatma çubuğu; Ateş başlatıcı jel; Ateş başlatıcı toz; Çakmak taşı ve çelik kit; Magnezyum blok; Tutuşturucu ip; Su geçirmez kibrit; Balmumu emdirilmiş ahşap yünü; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de acendedor: Pano carbonizado; Isco de algodão; Arco elétrico; Madeira resinosa; Barra de ferrocério; Cubo acendedor de fogo; Pau acendedor de fogo; Gel acendedor de fogo; Pólvora acendedora de fogo; Kit de pedra e aço; Bloco de magnésio; Corda de estopa; Fósforo à prova de água; Lã de madeira impregnada com cera; Outro
ru: Тип средства для розжига: Пережженная ткань; Хлопковый трут; Электрическая дуга; Осмол; Ферроцериевый стержень; Кубик для розжига; Палочка для розжига; Гель для розжига; Порошок для розжига; Кресало и кремень; Магниевый блок; Трутовая веревка; Водостойкая спичка; Вощеная древесная стружка; Другой
es: Tipo de encendedor: Tela carbonizada; Yesca de algodón; Arco voltaico; Madera de tea; Caña de ferrocerio; Pastilla para encender el fuego; Palo para encender el fuego; Gel para encender el fuego; Polvo para encender el fuego; Kit de pedernal y acero; Bloque de magnesio; Cuerda de yesca; Cerilla impermeable; Lana de madera con cera; Otros
en: Fire starter type: Char cloth; Cotton tinder; Electric arc; Fatwood; Ferrocerium rod; Fire starter cube; Fire starter stick; Fire starting gel; Fire starting powder; Flint and steel kit; Magnesium block; Tinder rope; Waterproof match; Wax-infused wood wool; Other
pl: Typ podpałki: Tkanina węglowa; Podpałka bawełniana; Łuk elektryczny; Fatwood (drewno żywiczne); Pręt ferrocerowy; Kostka podpałkowa; Podpałka w sztyfcie; Żel rozpałkowy; Proszek do rozpalania; Zestaw krzesiwa i stali; Blok magnezowy; Sznur podpałkowy; Zapałki wodoodporne; Wełna drzewna nasączona woskiem; Pozostałe
sk-SK: Typ zapaľovača: Zápalná tkanina; Bavlnený podpaľovací materiál; Elektrický oblúk; Živicové drevo; Ferroceriová tyčka; Podpaľovacia kocka; Podpaľovacia tyčinka; Podpaľovací gél; Podpaľovací prášok; Súprava s kresadlom; Horčíkový blok; Podpaľovacie lano; Vodotesná zápalka; Drevená vlna napustená voskom; Iné
pt-BR: Tipo de acendedor de fogo: Pano carbonizado; Isca de algodão; Arco elétrico; Madeira resinosa; Barra de ferrocério; Cubo iniciador de fogo; Bastão iniciador de fogo; Gel iniciador de fogo; Pó iniciador de fogo; Kit de pederneira e aço; Bloco de magnésio; Corda de ignição; Fósforo à prova d'água; Lã de madeira impregnada com cera; Outro
ja: ファイヤースターターのタイプ: チャークロス; コットン火口; 電気アーク; ファットウッド; フェロセリウム棒; 着火キューブ; 着火スティック; 着火ジェル; 着火パウダー; 火打ち石と打ち金キット; マグネシウムブロック; 火口ロープ; 防水マッチ; ワックス注入木毛; その他
bg-BG: Тип запалване: Плат за запалване; Памучен фитил; Електрическа дъга; Смолиста дървесина; Фероцериев прът; Кубче за разпалване; Пръчка за разпалване; Гел за разпалване; Прах за разпалване; Комплект от кремък и стомана; Магнезиево блокче; Въже от фитил; Водоустойчив кибрит; Восъчно напоени дървени стърготини; Друго
hr-HR: Vrsta potpaljivača: Pougljena tkanina; Pamučna potpalna vata; Električni luk; Luč; Šipka od ferocerija; Kocka za potpalu; Štap za potpalu; Gel za potpalu; Prah za potpalu; Komplet kremena i čelika; Magnezijev blok; Uže za potpalu; Vodootporna šibica; Drvena vuna natopljena voskom; Ostalo
zh-TW: 火種類型: 炭布; 棉質火絨; 電弧; 松明木; 鈰鐵棒; 立方體火種; 點燃棒; 凝膠火種; 粉末火種; 打火石工具包; 鎂塊; 引火繩; 防水火柴; 浸蠟木絲; 其他
fi: Sytykkeen tyyppi: Hiiltynyt kangas; Puuvillainen taula; Valokaari; Rasvapuu; Ferrocerium-sauva; Sytytyskuutio; Sytytystikku; Sytytysgeeli; Sytytysjauhe; Tuluspakkaus; Magnesiumpala; Taulanaru; Vedenpitävä tulitikku; Vahattu puukuitu; Muu
ro-RO: Tipul aprinzătorului: Pânză carbonizată; Iască de bumbac; Arc electric; Lemn de pin; Vergea de feroceriu; Cub de aprindere; Bețigaș de aprindere; Gel de aprindere; Pulbere de aprindere; Kit cremene și oțel; Bloc de magneziu; Frânghie de iască; Chibrit impermeabil; Lână de lemn impregnată cu ceară; Altele
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์จุดไฟ: ผ้าถ่าน; ใยฝ้ายจุดไฟ; อาร์กไฟฟ้า; ไม้สนเรซินจุดไฟ; แท่งเฟอร์โรเซเรียม; ก้อนเชื้อเพลิงจุดไฟ; แท่งเชื้อเพลิงจุดไฟ; เจลเชื้อเพลิงจุดไฟ; ผงเชื้อเพลิงจุดไฟ; ชุดหินเหล็กไฟกับเหล็กจุดไฟ; ก้อนแมกนีเซียมจุดไฟ; เชือกเชื้อไฟ; ไม้ขีดไฟกันน้ำ; ใยไม้ชุบขี้ผึ้งจุดไฟ; อื่นๆ
nl: Type vuurstarter: Verkoolde doek; Katoen tondel; Elektrische boog; Vet hout; Ferroceriumstaaf; Vuurstarterblokje; Vuurstarterstaafje; Vuurstartgel; Aanmaakpoeder voor vuur; Vuursteen- en staalkit; Magnesiumblok; Tondeltouw; Waterdichte match; Houtwol met wasinfusie; Overig
zh-CN: 点火器类型: 炭布; 棉花引火物; 电弧; 松脂木; 铁铈合金棒; 点火块; 点火棒; 点火凝胶; 引火粉; 打火石钢片套装; 镁块; 引火绳; 防水火柴; 浸蜡木丝; 其他
it: Tipo di accendifuoco: Tessuto carbonizzato; Esca di cotone; Arco elettrico; Legno resinoso; Asta di ferrocerio; Cubo accendifuoco; Bastoncino accendifuoco; Gel accendifuoco; Polvere accendifuoco; Kit di selce e acciaio; Blocco di magnesio; Corda per esca; Fiammiferi impermeabili; Lana di legno infusa di cera; Altro
fr: Type d’allume-feu: Tissu carbonisé; Amadou en coton; Arc électrique; Bois gras; Tige de ferrocerium; Cube allume-feu; Bâton allume-feu; Gel allume-feu; Poudre allume-feu; Kit de silex et d’acier; Bloc de magnésium; Corde d’amadou; Allumette étanche; Laine de bois imprégnée de cire; Autre
hu: Tűzgyújtó típusa: Szénszövet; Pamutgyújtós; Ívfény; Gyantás fa; Ferrocerium rúd; Tűzgyújtó kocka; Tűzgyújtó pálca; Tűzgyújtó gél; Tűzgyújtó por; Kovakő és acél készlet; Magnéziumtömb; Gyújtózsinór; Vízálló gyufa; Viasszal átitatott fagyapot; Egyéb
vi: Loại dụng cụ nhóm lửa: Vải than; Bông bùi nhùi; Hồ quang điện; Gỗ thông giàu nhựa; Thanh đánh lửa ferrocerium; Viên nhóm lửa; Que nhóm lửa; Gel nhóm lửa; Bột nhóm lửa; Bộ dụng cụ đánh lửa đá lửa và thép; Khối magiê; Dây mồi lửa; Diêm chống nước; Len gỗ tẩm sáp; Khác
el: Τύπος προσανάμματος: Απανθρακωμένο ύφασμα; Βαμβακερό προσάναμμα; Ηλεκτρικό τόξο; Ρητινώδες δαδί; Ράβδος φεροκερίου; Κύβος προσανάμματος; Ράβδος προσανάμματος; Τζελ προσανάμματος; Σκόνη προσανάμματος; Σετ πυρόλιθου και ατσαλιού; Μπλοκ μαγνησίου; Σχοινί προσανάμματος; Αδιάβροχο σπίρτο; Ξυλόμαλλο εμποτισμένο με κερί; Άλλο
nb: Type opptenningshjelpemiddel: Kult stoff; Bomullsfnugg; Elektrisk lysbue; Fettved; Ferroseriumstang; Oppfyringskubbe; Oppfyringspinne; Oppfyringsgel; Oppfyringspulver; Flint- og stålsett; Magnesiumblokk; Tinder-tau; Vanntett fyrstikk; Voksinfundert treull; Annet
da: Optændingstype: Kulklud; Bomuldsfyrsvamp; Elektrisk lysbue; Fatwood; Ferroceriumstang; Ildstarterterning; Ildstarterpind; Brandstartende gel; Antændingspulver; Sæt med flint og stål; Magnesiumblok; Antænding med reb; Vandtæt tændstik; Vokstilført træuld; Andet
de: Zündertyp: Holzkohlentuch; Baumwollzunder; Elektrischer Lichtbogen; Kienspan; Ferroceriumstab; Feuerstarterwürfel; Feuerstarterstick; Anzündgel; Anzündpulver; Feuerstein- und Stahlset; Magnesiumblock; Zunderseil; Wasserdichtes Streichholz; Wachsgetränkte Holzwolle; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Vrsta prižiga ognja: Ogljena tkanina; Bombažna truba; Električni lok; Fatwood; Ferocerijeva palica; Shopify Starter; Shopify Starter Fire; Gel za vžig ognja; Prah za vžig ognja; Komplet iz kremena in jekla; Magnezijev blok; Vrv za kresivo; Vodoodporna vžigalica; Lesna volna, prepojena z voskom; Druga
lt-LT: Užkūrimo priemonės tipas: Anglies audinys; Medvilninė skiltis; Elektros lankas; Dervinga skiedra; Ferocerio strypas; Ugnies uždegimo kubas; Ugnies uždegimo lazdelė; Ugnies uždegimo gelis; Ugnies uždegimo milteliai; Titnago ir plieno rinkinys; Magnio blokas; Skilties virvė; Vandeniui atsparus degtukas; Vašku impregnuota medienos vata; Kita
cs: Typ podpalovače: Práchno; Bavlněný troud; Elektrický oblouk; Třísky z borovice; Ferroceriová tyč; Podpalovací kostka; Podpalovací tyčinka; Gelový podpalovač; Práškový podpalovač; Sada ocílky a křesacího kamene; Hořčíkový blok; Provaz na rozdělávání ohně; Voděodolná zápalka; Dřevitá vlna s voskem; Jiné
ko: 착화제 유형: 탄화포; 면 불씨재; 전기 아크; 팻우드; 페로세륨 로드; 발화 큐브; 발화 스틱; 발화 젤; 발화 파우더; 부싯돌과 부쇠 세트; 마그네슘 블록; 틴더 로프; 방수 성냥; 왁스 침투 목모; 기타
sv: Typ av tändmedel: Förkolnat tyg; Bomullsfnöske; Elektrisk ljusbåge; Fettved; Ferroceriumstav; Tändkub; Tändpinne; Tändgel; Tändpulver; Eldstålset; Magnesiumblock; Tinder-rep; Vattentät tändsticka; Vaximpregnerad träull; Övrigt